Illinois, session 104th, HB4986.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 356z.22 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/356z.22)7    Sec. 356z.22. Coverage for telehealth services.8    (a) For purposes of this Section:9    "Asynchronous store and forward system" has the meaning 10given to that term in Section 5 of the Telehealth Act. 11    "Distant site" has the meaning given to that term in 12Section 5 of the Telehealth Act.13    "E-visits" has the meaning given to that term in Section 5 14of the Telehealth Act.15    "Facility" means any hospital facility licensed under the 16Hospital Licensing Act or the University of Illinois Hospital 17Act, a federally qualified health center, a community mental 18health center, a behavioral health clinic, a substance use 19disorder treatment program licensed by the Division of 20Substance Use Prevention and Recovery of the Department of 21Human Services, or other building, place, or institution that 22is owned or operated by a person that is licensed or otherwise 23authorized to deliver health care services.  HB4986- 2 -LRB104 15321 BAB 28475 b1    "Health care professional" has the meaning given to that 2term in Section 5 of the Telehealth Act. 3    "Interactive telecommunications system" has the meaning 4given to that term in Section 5 of the Telehealth Act. As used 5in this Section, "interactive telecommunications system" does 6not include virtual check-ins.7    "Originating site" has the meaning given to that term in 8Section 5 of the Telehealth Act.9    "Telehealth services" has the meaning given to that term 10in Section 5 of the Telehealth Act. As used in this Section, 11"telehealth services" do not include asynchronous store and 12forward systems, remote patient monitoring technologies, 13e-visits, or virtual check-ins.14    "Virtual check-in" has the meaning given to that term in 15Section 5 of the Telehealth Act. 16    (b) An individual or group policy of accident or health 17insurance that is amended, delivered, issued, or renewed on or 18after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 19General Assembly shall cover telehealth services, e-visits, 20and virtual check-ins rendered by a health care professional 21when clinically appropriate and medically necessary to 22insureds, enrollees, and members in the same manner as any 23other benefits covered under the policy. An individual or 24group policy of accident or health insurance may provide 25reimbursement to a facility that serves as the originating 26site at the time a telehealth service is rendered.  HB4986- 3 -LRB104 15321 BAB 28475 b1    (c) To ensure telehealth service, e-visit, and virtual 2check-in access is equitable for all patients in receipt of 3health care services under this Section and health care 4professionals and facilities are able to deliver medically 5necessary services that can be appropriately delivered via 6telehealth within the scope of their licensure or 7certification, coverage required under this Section shall 8comply with all of the following: 9        (1) An individual or group policy of accident or 10    health insurance shall not:11            (A) require that in-person contact occur between a 12        health care professional and a patient before the 13        provision of a telehealth service;14            (B) require patients, health care professionals, 15        or facilities to prove or document a hardship or 16        access barrier to an in-person consultation for 17        coverage and reimbursement of telehealth services, 18        e-visits, or virtual check-ins;19            (C) require the use of telehealth services, 20        e-visits, or virtual check-ins when the health care 21        professional has determined that it is not 22        appropriate;23            (D) require the use of telehealth services when a 24        patient chooses an in-person consultation; 25            (E) require a health care professional to be 26        physically present in the same room as the patient at   HB4986- 4 -LRB104 15321 BAB 28475 b1        the originating site, unless deemed medically 2        necessary by the health care professional providing 3        the telehealth service; 4            (F) create geographic or facility restrictions or 5        requirements for telehealth services, e-visits, or 6        virtual check-ins;7            (G) require health care professionals or 8        facilities to offer or provide telehealth services, 9        e-visits, or virtual check-ins;10            (H) require patients to use telehealth services, 11        e-visits, or virtual check-ins, or require patients to 12        use a separate panel of health care professionals or 13        facilities to receive telehealth service, e-visit, or 14        virtual check-in coverage and reimbursement; or 15            (I) impose upon telehealth services, e-visits, or 16        virtual check-ins utilization review requirements that 17        are unnecessary, duplicative, or unwarranted or impose 18        any treatment limitations, prior authorization, 19        documentation, or recordkeeping requirements that are 20        more stringent than the requirements applicable to the 21        same health care service when rendered in-person, 22        except procedure code modifiers may be required to 23        document telehealth.24        (2) Deductibles, copayments, coinsurance, or any other 25    cost-sharing applicable to services provided through 26    telehealth shall not exceed the deductibles, copayments,   HB4986- 5 -LRB104 15321 BAB 28475 b1    coinsurance, or any other cost-sharing required by the 2    individual or group policy of accident or health insurance 3    for the same services provided through in-person 4    consultation.5        (3) An individual or group policy of accident or 6    health insurance shall notify health care professionals 7    and facilities of any instructions necessary to facilitate 8    billing for telehealth services, e-visits, and virtual 9    check-ins. 10    (d) For purposes of reimbursement, an individual or group 11policy of accident or health insurance that is amended, 12delivered, issued, or renewed on or after the effective date 13of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly shall 14reimburse an in-network health care professional or facility, 15including a health care professional or facility in a tiered 16network, for telehealth services provided through an 17interactive telecommunications system on the same basis, in 18the same manner, and at the same reimbursement rate that would 19apply to the services if the services had been delivered via an 20in-person encounter by an in-network or tiered network health 21care professional or facility. This subsection applies only to 22those services provided by telehealth that may otherwise be 23billed as an in-person service. This subsection is inoperative 24on and after January 1, 2028, except that this subsection is 25operative after that date with respect to mental health and 26substance use disorder telehealth services.  HB4986- 6 -LRB104 15321 BAB 28475 b1    (e) The Department and the Department of Public Health 2shall commission a report to the General Assembly administered 3by an established medical college in this State wherein 4supervised clinical training takes place at an affiliated 5institution that uses telehealth services, subject to 6appropriation. The report shall study the telehealth coverage 7and reimbursement policies established in subsections (b) and 8(d) of this Section, to determine if the policies improve 9access to care, reduce health disparities, promote health 10equity, have an impact on utilization and cost-avoidance, 11including direct or indirect cost savings to the patient, and 12to provide any recommendations for telehealth access expansion 13in the future. An individual or group policy of accident or 14health insurance shall provide data necessary to carry out the 15requirements of this subsection upon request of the 16Department. The Department and the Department of Public Health 17shall submit the report by December 31, 2026. The established 18medical college may utilize subject matter expertise to 19complete any necessary actuarial analysis.20    (f) Nothing in this Section is intended to limit the 21ability of an individual or group policy of accident or health 22insurance and a health care professional or facility to 23voluntarily negotiate alternate reimbursement rates for 24telehealth services. Such voluntary negotiations shall take 25into consideration the ongoing investment necessary to ensure 26these telehealth platforms may be continuously maintained,   HB4986- 7 -LRB104 15321 BAB 28475 b1seamlessly updated, and integrated with a patient's electronic 2medical records. 3    (g) An individual or group policy of accident or health 4insurance that is amended, delivered, issued, or renewed on or 5after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 6General Assembly shall provide coverage for telehealth 7services for licensed dietitian nutritionists and certified 8diabetes educators who counsel diabetes patients in the 9diabetes patients' homes to remove the hurdle of 10transportation for diabetes patients to receive treatment, in 11accordance with the Dietitian Nutritionist Practice Act. 12    (h) Any policy, contract, or certificate of health 13insurance coverage that does not distinguish between 14in-network and out-of-network health care professionals and 15facilities shall be subject to this Section as though all 16health care professionals and facilities were in-network.17    (i) Health care professionals and facilities shall 18determine the appropriateness of specific sites, technology 19platforms, and technology vendors for a telehealth service, as 20long as delivered services adhere to all federal and State 21privacy, security, and confidentiality laws, rules, or 22regulations, including, but not limited to, the Health 23Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 and the 24Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Confidentiality 25Act. 26    (j) Nothing in this Section shall be deemed as precluding   HB4986- 8 -LRB104 15321 BAB 28475 b1a health insurer from providing benefits for other telehealth 2services, including, but not limited to, services not required 3for coverage provided through an asynchronous store and 4forward system, remote patient monitoring services, other 5monitoring services, or oral communications otherwise covered 6under the policy. 7    (k) There shall be no restrictions on originating site 8requirements for telehealth coverage or reimbursement to the 9distant site under this Section other than requiring the 10telehealth services to be medically necessary and clinically 11appropriate.12    (l) The Department may adopt rules, including emergency 13rules subject to the provisions of Section 5-45 of the 14Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 15provisions of this Section. 16(Source: P.A. 102-104, eff. 7-22-21.)